Washington statutes.
RCW 23.86.145

Rights of dissenting members.

(1) Except as provided otherwise under this chapter, the rights and procedures set forth in chapter 23B.13 RCW shall apply to a member who elects to exercise the right of dissent.

(2) The articles of incorporation of an association subject to this chapter may provide that a dissenting member shall be limited to a return of less than the fair value of the member's equity interest in the association, but a dissenting member may not be limited to a return of less than the consideration paid to or retained by the association for the equity interest unless the fair value is less than the consideration paid to or retained by the association.

(3) Any member of an agricultural association who exercises the right to dissent from an association action described in RCW 23.86.135 shall be entitled to payment of the member's equity interest on the same time schedule that would have applied if membership in the association had been terminated.

(4) Subsection (3) of this section does not apply to agricultural associations that are involved in an action under subsection (3) of this section before June 9, 1994: (a) As to the associations that were involved in the particular action; (b) for three years after June 9, 1994.

[ 1994 c 206 s 2; 1991 c 72 s 16; 1989 c 307 s 31.]

NOTES:

Legislative finding—1989 c 307: See note following RCW 23.86.007.